California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(j) The licenseholder or the authorized licensee or its designated representative is authorized to perform setup and breakdown of the instructional tasting event area. The authorized licensee or its designated representative may provide, free of charge to the licenseholder, the equipment, materials, and utensils as may be required for use in connection with the
 instructional tasting event.

(k) (1) A licenseholder shall not require, or enter into a collusive scheme with, an authorized licensee or its designated representative to conduct one or more instructional tasting events as a condition of the licenseholder’s carrying or continuing to carry a brand or brands of the authorized licensee or as a condition for display or other merchandising plan which is based on an agreement to provide shelf space. An authorized licensee or its designated representative shall not require any preferential treatment or benefit from, or enter into a collusive scheme with, a licenseholder as a condition of conducting one or more instructional tasting events, require a licenseholder to carry or continue to carry a brand or brands of the authorized licensee as a condition of conducting one or more
 instructional tasting events, or condition display or other merchandising plans that are based on agreements for the provision of shelf space on the conducting of one or more instructional tasting events. Any agreement, whether written or oral, entered into by and between a licenseholder and an authorized licensee or its designated representative that precludes the conducting of instructional tasting events on the premises of the licenseholder by any other authorized licensee is prohibited. A licenseholder or authorized licensee, or its designated representative, shall not use an instructional tasting event to circumvent any other requirements of this division.

(2) In addition to any other remedies available under this division, upon a finding by the department of a failure to comply with this subdivision, the department shall suspend
 the instructional tasting license of the licenseholder and the privilege of the authorized licensee to conduct instructional events for not less than six months but for no more than one year.

(l) The Legislature finds that it is necessary and proper to require a separation between manufacturing interests, wholesale interests, and retail interests in the production and distribution of alcoholic beverages in order to prevent suppliers from dominating local markets through vertical integration and to prevent excessive sales of alcoholic beverages produced by overly aggressive marketing techniques. The Legislature further finds that the exception established by this section to the general prohibition against tied interests must be limited to its express terms so as not to undermine the general prohibition, and intends that this section be construed accordingly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 257, Sec. 4.   (SB 788)   Effective September 5, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.57.

(a) (1) An authorized licensee, or its designated representative, may instruct consumers at an on-sale retail licensed premises authorized to sell its product with the permission of the retail on-sale licensee. The instruction may include, without limitation, the history, nature, values, and characteristics of the wine or distilled spirits and the methods of presenting and serving the wine or distilled spirits.

(2) The instruction of consumers may include the furnishing of not more than three tastings to any individual in one day. A single tasting of distilled spirits may not exceed one-fourth of one ounce and a single tasting of wine may not exceed one ounce.

(3) The authorized licensee, or its designated representative, shall either supply the wine or distilled spirits to be tasted during the instructional tasting event or purchase the wine or distilled spirits from the retail on-sale licensee at the original invoiced cost.

(4) The authorized licensee, or its designated representative, shall remove any unfinished alcoholic beverages that were supplied by the authorized licensee, or its designated representative, following the instruction.

(5) Nothing in this subdivision shall limit the giving away of samples pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 23386.

(b) For purposes of this section, “authorized licensee” means a winegrower,
 California winegrower’s agent, beer and wine importer general, beer and wine wholesaler, wine rectifier, craft distiller, distilled spirits manufacturer, distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent, distilled spirits importer general, distilled spirits rectifier, distilled spirits general rectifier, rectifier, out-of-state distilled spirits shipper’s certificate holder, distilled spirits wholesaler, brandy manufacturer, brandy importer, or California brandy wholesaler. “Authorized licensee” shall not include any person that solely holds a combination of a beer and wine wholesaler license and an off-sale beer and wine retail license or holds those licenses solely in combination with any license not listed in this paragraph, or in combination with a beer and wine importer general license, or holds a limited off-sale retail wine license.

(c) Except as
 otherwise provided in this division or by the rules of the department, no premium, gift, free goods, or other thing of value shall be given away by an authorized licensee or its designated representative in connection with an instructional tasting event conducted pursuant to this section that includes tastings of wine or distilled spirits.

(d) In addition to any point-of-sale advertising or other advertising items allowed under this division or under rules of the department, an authorized licensee or its designated representative, in their absolute discretion and with permission of the retail on-sale licensee upon whose premises the instructional tasting event will be held, may list in any advertisement to the general public for the instructional tasting the name, address, telephone number, email address, internet website address, and
 any other electronic media of the on-sale retail licensee, the names of the wines or distilled spirits being featured at the instructional tasting event, pictures, illustrations, and depictions of the retailer’s premises, personnel, and customers, and the time, date, and location of, and other information about, the instructional tasting event, provided that both of the following apply:

(1) The advertisement does not contain the retail price of the alcoholic beverages.

(2) The listing of the licenseholder’s name, address, telephone number, email address, internet website address, and any other electronic media in the
 advertisement, and any pictures, illustrations, or depictions, are relatively inconspicuous in relation to the advertisement as a whole. Laudatory references to the licenseholder in these advertisements are not authorized. Pictures, illustrations, or depictions shall be still pictures, illustrations, or depictions only and shall not include any video. The reposting of social media posts, including posts by the retailer, is permitted provided that the reposting complies with all the requirements of this section. Nothing in this section shall authorize an authorized licensee or its designated representative to share in the costs, if any, of the licenseholder.

(e) An on-sale retail licensee may advertise an instructional tasting event to the general public. The costs of this advertising shall be borne solely by the on-sale retail
 licensee. Advertising permitted by this subdivision includes flyers, newspaper ads,
 internet communications, and interior signage.

(f) No more than one authorized licensee or its designated representative shall conduct an instructional tasting pursuant to this section at the on-sale retail licensed premises of an on-sale retail licensee at any time, and a person shall not act as the designated representative for more than one authorized licensee at that instructional tasting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 257, Sec. 5.   (SB 788)   Effective September 5, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.6.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a beer manufacturer, the holder of a winegrower’s license, a rectifier, a craft distiller, a distilled spirits manufacturer, or distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent may purchase advertising space and time from, or on behalf of, an on-sale retail licensee subject to all of the following conditions:

(1) The on-sale licensee is the owner, manager, agent of the owner, assignee of the owner’s advertising rights, or the major tenant of the owner of any of the following:

(A) An outdoor stadium or a fully enclosed arena with a fixed seating capacity in excess of 10,000 seats located in the County of Sacramento or the County of Alameda.

(B) (i) A fully enclosed arena with a fixed seating capacity in excess of 18,000 seats located in the County of Los Angeles.

(ii) An outdoor stadium of at least 70,000 seats located in the County of Los Angeles operated by a joint powers authority.

(C) An outdoor stadium or fully enclosed arena with a fixed seating capacity in excess of 8,500 seats located in the County of Kern.

(D) An exposition park of not less than 50 acres that includes an outdoor stadium with a fixed seating capacity in excess of 8,000 seats and a fully enclosed arena with an attendance capacity in excess of 4,500 people, located in the County of San Bernardino.

(E) An outdoor stadium with a fixed
 seating capacity in excess of 10,000 seats located in the County of Yolo.

(F) An outdoor stadium and a fully enclosed arena with fixed seating capacities in excess of 10,000 seats located in the County of Fresno.

(G) An athletic and entertainment complex of not less than 50 acres that includes within its boundaries an outdoor stadium with a fixed seating capacity of at least 8,000 seats and a second outdoor stadium with a fixed seating capacity of at least 3,500 seats located in the County of Riverside.

(H) An outdoor stadium with a fixed seating capacity in excess of 1,500 seats located in the County of Tulare.

(I) A motorsports entertainment complex of not less than 50 acres that includes within its boundaries an outdoor speedway with a fixed seating
 capacity of at least 25,000 seats, located in the County of San Bernardino.

(J) An exposition park, owned or operated by a bona fide nonprofit organization, of not less than 400 acres with facilities including a grandstand with a seating capacity of at least 8,000 people, at least one exhibition hall greater than 100,000 square feet, and at least four exhibition halls, each greater than 30,000 square feet, located in the City of Pomona or the City of La Verne in the County of Los Angeles.

(K) An outdoor soccer stadium with a fixed seating capacity of at least 25,000 seats, an outdoor tennis stadium with a fixed seating capacity of at least 7,000 seats, an outdoor track and field facility with a fixed seating capacity of at least 7,000 seats, and an indoor velodrome with a fixed seating capacity of at least 2,000 seats, all located within a sports and athletic complex built before
 January 1, 2005, in the City of Carson in the County of Los Angeles.

(L) An outdoor professional sports facility with a fixed seating capacity of at least 4,200 seats located in the County of San Joaquin.

(M) A fully enclosed arena with a fixed seating capacity in excess of 13,000 seats located in the City of Inglewood.

(N) (i) An outdoor stadium with a fixed seating capacity of at least 68,000 seats located in the City of Santa Clara.

(ii) A beer manufacturer, the holder of a winegrower’s license, a rectifier, a craft distiller, a distilled spirits manufacturer, or distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent may purchase advertising space and time from, or on behalf of, a major tenant of an outdoor stadium described in clause (i),
 provided the major tenant does not hold a retail license, and the advertising may include the placement of advertising in an on-sale licensed premises operated at the outdoor stadium.

(O) A complex of not more than 50 acres located on the campus of, and owned by, Sonoma State University dedicated to presenting live artistic, musical, sports, food, beverage, culinary, lifestyle, or other cultural and entertainment events and performances with venues that include a concert hall with a seating capacity of approximately 1,500 seats, a second concert hall with a seating capacity of up to 300 seats, an outdoor area with a seating capacity of up to 5,000 seats, and a further outdoor area with a seating capacity of up to 10,000 seats. With respect to this complex, advertising space and time may also be purchased from or on behalf of the owner of the complex, a long-term tenant or licensee of the venue, whether or not the owner, long-term tenant, or
 licensee holds an on-sale license.

(P) A fairgrounds with a horse racetrack and equestrian and sports facilities located in the County of San Diego.

(Q) (i) A stadium with a fixed seating capacity of at least 70,000 seats located in the City of Inglewood and a performance venue with a seating capacity of at least 5,000 seats adjacent to the stadium. Advertising authorized by this clause may be placed in areas within the retail, entertainment, commercial, and mixed-use development which includes the stadium and performance venue, provided that the advertising shall not be placed on or in, or otherwise promote, any permanently licensed retail premises other than the stadium or performance venue.

(ii) A fully enclosed arena with a seating capacity of at least 18,000 seats located in the City of
 Inglewood. Advertising authorized by this clause may be placed on or in the fully enclosed arena and within the perimeter of the main entry area immediately adjacent to the arena, which includes an open plaza and band shell, provided that the advertising shall not be placed on or in, or otherwise promote, any permanently licensed retail premises other than the fully enclosed arena or a permanently licensed retail premises located within the main entry area that is wholly owned by and operated by or for the owner of the arena.

(R) An outdoor stadium with a fixed seating capacity of at least 40,000 seats located in the City and County of San Francisco.

(S) An indoor arena with a fixed seating capacity of at least 13,000 seats located in the City and County of San Francisco.

(T) An outdoor stadium with a fixed seating
 capacity in excess of 20,000 seats located in the City of Los Angeles.

(U) An outdoor stadium with a fixed seating capacity of at least 43,000 seats located in the City of San Diego.

(V) An outdoor professional sports stadium with a fixed seating capacity of at least 3,000 seats located in the City of San Jose.

(W) An outdoor professional sports stadium with a fixed seating capacity of at least 15,000 seats located in the City of San Jose.

(X) A fully enclosed arena with a fixed seating capacity in excess of 4,000 seats located in the City of San Jose.

(Y) A fully enclosed arena with a fixed seating capacity in excess of 10,000 seats located in the County of Riverside.

(Z) Any of the following facilities that are situated on the campus of San Diego State University (SDSU), including the SDSU Mission Valley site, located in the County of San Diego.

(i) An outdoor multipurpose stadium with a fixed seating capacity of at least 30,000 seats.

(ii) A fully enclosed arena with a fixed seating capacity in excess of 10,000 seats.

(iii) An outdoor baseball stadium with a fixed seating capacity of at least 1,800 seats.

(iv) An outdoor softball stadium with a fixed seating capacity of at least 300 seats.

(v) An open-air amphitheater with a fixed seating capacity of at least 4,000 seats.

(AA) Any of the following facilities that are situated on the campus of California Polytechnic State University, San Luis Obispo, located in the County of San Luis Obispo:

(i) An outdoor stadium with a fixed seating capacity of at least 11,000 seats.

(ii) A fully enclosed arena with a fixed seating capacity of at least 3,000 seats.

(iii) An outdoor stadium with a fixed seating capacity of at least 3,000 seats.

(iv) An outdoor stadium with a fixed seating capacity of at least 800 seats.

(v) An indoor performing arts venue with two concert halls and a theater with a combined fixed seating capacity of at least 1,800 seats.

(AB) Any of the following facilities that are situated on the campus of California State University, Fresno, located in the County of Fresno:

(i) An outdoor stadium with a fixed seating capacity of at least 40,000 seats.

(ii) An outdoor stadium with a fixed seating capacity of at least 5,000 seats.

(iii) An outdoor stadium with a fixed seating capacity of at least 2,400 seats.

(iv) An outdoor stadium with a fixed seating capacity of at least 2,000 seats.

(AC) Any of the following facilities that are situated on the campus of California State University, Sacramento, located in the County of Sacramento:

(i) An outdoor stadium with a fixed seating capacity of at least 20,000 seats.

(ii) A fully enclosed arena with a fixed seating capacity of at least 1,000 seats.

(iii) An outdoor stadium with a fixed seating capacity of at least 1,200 seats.

(iv) An outdoor stadium with a fixed seating capacity of at least 800 seats.

(v) An outdoor stadium with a fixed seating capacity of at least 1,000 seats.

(AD) An outdoor stadium with a fixed seating
 capacity of at least 6,000 seats that is situated on the campus of California State University, Monterey Bay, located in the County of Monterey.

(AE) Any of the following facilities that are situated on the campus of California State University, Fullerton, located in the County of Orange:

(i) A fully enclosed arena with a fixed seating capacity of at least 4,000 seats.

(ii) An outdoor stadium with a fixed seating capacity of at least 3,500 seats.

(iii) An outdoor stadium with a fixed seating capacity of at least 1,000 seats.

(iv) An outdoor stadium with a fixed seating capacity of at least 10,000 seats.

(AF) Any of the following facilities that are situated on the campus of San Jose State University,
 located in the County of Santa Clara:

(i) An outdoor stadium with a fixed seating capacity of at least 17,000 seats.

(ii) A fully enclosed arena with a fixed seating capacity of at least 5,000 seats.

(AG) Any of the following facilities that are situated on the campus of California State University, Northridge, located in the County of Los Angeles:

(i) An indoor performing arts center with a fixed seating capacity of at least 1,700 seats.

(ii) A fully enclosed arena with a fixed seating capacity of at least 2,000 seats.

(AH) Any of the following facilities that are situated on the campus of St. Mary’s College of California,
 located in the County of Contra Costa:

(i) A fully enclosed arena with a fixed seating capacity in excess of 3,500 seats located in the Town of Moraga.

(ii) An outdoor stadium with a fixed seating capacity of at least 5,500 seats located in the Town of Moraga.

(iii) An outdoor stadium with a fixed seating capacity of at least 650 seats located in the Town of Moraga.

(AI) A fully enclosed arena with a fixed seating capacity in excess of 5,000 seats located in the City of Oceanside.

(2) The outdoor stadium or fully enclosed arena described in paragraph (1) is not owned by a community
 college district.

(3) The advertising space or time is purchased only in connection with the events to be held on the premises of the exposition park, stadium, or arena owned by the on-sale licensee. With respect to an exposition park as described in subparagraph (J) of paragraph (1) that includes at least one hotel, the advertising space or time shall not be displayed on or in any hotel located in the exposition park, or purchased in connection with the operation of any hotel located in the exposition park. With respect to the complex described in subparagraph (O) of paragraph (1), the advertising space or time shall be purchased only in connection with live artistic, musical, sports, food, beverage, culinary, lifestyle, or other cultural and entertainment events and performances to be held on the premises of the complex. With respect to a fully enclosed arena described in subparagraph (X) of paragraph (1), advertising space or time shall be
 purchased only for interior advertising in connection with events conducted within the arena.

(4) The on-sale licensee serves other brands of beer distributed by a competing beer wholesaler in addition to the brand manufactured or marketed by the beer manufacturer, other brands of wine distributed by a competing wine wholesaler in addition to the brand produced by the winegrower, and other brands of distilled spirits distributed by a competing distilled spirits wholesaler in addition to the brand manufactured or marketed by the rectifier, the craft distiller, the distilled spirits manufacturer, or the distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent that purchased the advertising space or time.

(b) Any purchase of advertising space or time pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be conducted pursuant to a written contract entered into by the beer manufacturer, the holder of the winegrower’s
 license, the rectifier, the craft distiller, the distilled spirits manufacturer, or the distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent and any of the following:

(1) The on-sale licensee.

(2) With respect to clause (ii) of subparagraph (N) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the major tenant of the outdoor stadium.

(3) With respect to subparagraphs (O), (Q), (R), (T), (Y), (Z), (AA), (AB), (AC), (AD), (AE), (AF), (AG), (AH), and (AI) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the owner, a long-term tenant of the complex, or licensee of the complex, whether or not the owner, long-term tenant, or licensee holds an on-sale license.

(c) Any beer manufacturer or holder of a winegrower’s license, any rectifier, any craft distiller, any distilled spirits manufacturer, or any distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent who, through coercion or other illegal means, induces, directly or indirectly, a holder of a wholesaler’s license to fulfill all or part of those contractual obligations entered into pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine in an amount equal to the entire value of the advertising space, time, or costs involved in the contract, whichever is greater, plus ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both imprisonment and fine. The person shall also be subject to license revocation pursuant to Section 24200.

(d) Any on-sale retail licensee, as described in subdivision (a), who, directly or
 indirectly, solicits or coerces a holder of a wholesaler’s license to solicit a beer manufacturer, a holder of a winegrower’s license, a rectifier, a craft distiller, a distilled spirits manufacturer, or a distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent to purchase advertising space or time pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine in an amount equal to the entire value of the advertising space or time involved in the contract, whichever is greater, plus ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both imprisonment and fine. The person shall also be subject to license revocation pursuant to Section 24200.

(e) For the purposes of this section, “beer manufacturer” includes any holder of a beer manufacturer’s license, any holder of an out-of-state beer manufacturer’s certificate, or any holder of a beer and wine importer’s general
 license.

(f) The Legislature finds that it is necessary and proper to require a separation among manufacturing interests, wholesale interests, and retail interests in the production and distribution of alcoholic beverages in order to prevent suppliers from dominating local markets through vertical integration and to prevent excessive sales of alcoholic beverages produced by overly aggressive marketing techniques. The Legislature further finds that the exceptions established by this section to the general prohibition against tied interests shall be limited to their express terms so as not to undermine the general prohibition and intends that this section be construed accordingly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 429, Sec. 1.   (AB 3069)   Effective September 22, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.61.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a beer manufacturer, holder of a winegrower’s license, rectifier, winegrower’s agent, holder of an importer’s general license, distilled spirits manufacturer, craft distiller, holder of a distilled spirits rectifier’s general license, or distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent, regardless of any other licenses held by the foregoing, may sponsor events promoted by, and may purchase advertising space and time from, or on behalf of, an on-sale licensee that is the owner, operator, agent of the operator, or assignee of the operator’s advertising rights of a mixed-use district subject to all of the following conditions:

(1) The owner, operator, agent of the operator, or sole assignee of the operator’s advertising rights of the mixed-use district has its principal place of business in the County of Orange.

(2) The mixed-use district consists of not less than 90 acres that include office, residential, hotel, retail, dining, public gathering, and performing arts facilities, as well as a public intermodal transportation center, all of which are situated on land surrounding a fully enclosed arena with a fixed seating capacity in excess of 18,000 seats located in the County of Orange.

(3) The advertising space or time is purchased only in connection with retail, dining, entertainment, and events conducted
 on the grounds of the mixed-use district. Nothing in this section shall authorize advertising or promoting of any retail licensee or premises other than an on-sale licensee or premises owned by the person described in paragraph (1). Nothing in this section shall authorize the placement of advertising space or time outside of the mixed-use district.

(4) Any on-sale licensee, including any on-sale licensee owned by the person described in paragraph (1), operating at a venue on the grounds of the mixed-use district shall serve other brands of beer, distilled spirits, and wine in addition to any brand manufactured or distributed by the sponsoring or advertising beer manufacturer, holder of a winegrower’s license, rectifier, winegrower’s agent, holder of an importer’s general license, distilled spirits manufacturer, craft distiller, holder of a
 distilled spirits rectifier’s general license, or distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent.

(5) An agreement for the sponsorship of, or for the purchase of advertising space and time in connection with, the retail, dining, entertainment, and events conducted on the grounds of the mixed-use district shall not be conditioned directly or indirectly, in any way, on the purchase, sale, or distribution of any alcoholic beverage manufactured or distributed by the sponsoring or advertising beer manufacturer, holder of a winegrower’s license, rectifier, winegrower’s agent, holder of an importer’s general license, distilled spirits manufacturer, craft distiller, holder of a distilled spirits rectifier’s general license, or distilled spirits manufacturer’s
 agent, or by any on-sale retail licensee.

(6) Advertising authorized by this section may be placed in areas within the mixed-use district, provided that the advertising shall not be placed on or in or otherwise promote any permanently licensed retail premises, except as authorized in subdivision (g).

(7) Except as authorized in subdivision (g), a person, including the person described in paragraph (1) or any on-sale licensee owned by the person described in paragraph (1), shall not establish conditions, directly or indirectly, on any retail licensee or retail licensed business in the mixed-use district, or as a condition for any retail licensee or retail licensed business to lease, rent, or
 purchase property in the mixed-use district, that require or authorize the retail licensee or retail licensed business to display advertisements authorized by this section.

(b) Any sponsorship of events or purchase of advertising space or time conducted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be conducted pursuant to a written contract entered into by the beer manufacturer, holder of a winegrower’s license, rectifier, winegrower’s agent, holder of an importer’s general license, distilled spirits manufacturer, craft distiller, holder of a distilled spirits rectifier’s general license, or distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent and any of the following:

(1) The person described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(2) Any
 on-sale licensee owned by the person described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(c) Any beer manufacturer, holder of a winegrower’s license, rectifier, winegrower’s agent, holder of an importer’s general license, distilled spirits manufacturer, craft distiller, holder of a distilled spirits rectifier’s general license, or distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent who, through coercion or other illegal means, induces, directly or indirectly, a holder of a wholesaler’s license to fulfill those contractual obligations entered into pursuant to this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine in an amount equal to the entire value of the advertising space or time involved in the contract, whichever is greater, plus ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both
 imprisonment and fine. The person shall also be subject to license revocation pursuant to Section 24200.

(d) Any on-sale retail licensee who, directly or indirectly, solicits or coerces a holder of a wholesaler’s license to solicit a beer manufacturer, holder of a winegrower’s license, rectifier, winegrower’s agent, holder of an importer’s general license, distilled spirits manufacturer, craft distiller, holder of a distilled spirits rectifier’s general license, or distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent to purchase advertising time or space pursuant to this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine in an amount equal to the entire value of the advertising space or time involved in the contract, whichever is greater, plus ten thousand dollars
 ($10,000), or by both imprisonment and fine. The person shall also be subject to license revocation pursuant to Section 24200.

(e) For purposes of this section, “beer manufacturer” includes a holder of a beer manufacturer’s license, holder of an out-of-state beer manufacturer’s certificate, or holder of a beer and wine importer’s general license.

(f) Nothing in this section shall authorize the purchasing of advertising space or time directly from, or on behalf of, any on-sale licensee other than the person described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) or an on-sale licensee owned by that person.

(g) Nothing in this section shall authorize the placement of advertising space or time directly in, or on the exterior of, the premises
 of any on-sale licensee in the mixed-use district
 except as follows:

(1) An on-sale licensee that is wholly owned by the person described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(2) (A) Subject to the limitations described in subparagraphs (B) to (E), inclusive, the lobby areas of hotels, performing arts venues, and entertainment venues, that are not owned by the person described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(B) Placement of advertising space or time is not authorized in parts of a lobby area that contain a bar or restaurant.

(C) Placement of advertising space or time that is
 customized to the particular lobby area is not authorized.

(D) Placement of advertising space or time in more than one location in a lobby area is not authorized.

(E) Placement of advertising space or time on a sign or other display that is not owned by the person described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) is not authorized.

(3) The common area-facing exteriors of hotels, performing art venues, entertainment venues, and buildings with multiple tenants including an on-sale licensed premises that is not owned by the person described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(4) The authorization provided by this subdivision is subject to the limitations provided in
 subdivisions (h) and (i).

(h) Nothing in this section shall authorize a beer manufacturer, holder of a winegrower’s license, rectifier, winegrower’s agent, holder of an importer’s general license, distilled spirits manufacturer, craft distiller, holder of a distilled spirits rectifier’s general license, or distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent to furnish, give, or lend anything of value to an on-sale retail licensee, either directly or indirectly, other than the person described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) or an on-sale licensee owned by that person and except as expressly authorized by this section or this division.

(i) No funds, revenue, or other consideration from any sponsorship of events or purchase of advertising space or time conducted pursuant to this section shall be
 furnished, given, or lent, either directly or indirectly, by the person described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), or by an on-sale licensee owned by that person, to any licensee other than an on-sale licensee owned by the person described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(j) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or abrogate the provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 5200) of Division 3.

(k) The Legislature finds that it is necessary and proper to require a separation among manufacturing interests, wholesale interests, and retail interests in the production and distribution of
 alcoholic beverages in order to prevent suppliers from dominating local markets through vertical integration and to prevent excessive sales of alcoholic beverages produced by overly aggressive marketing techniques. The Legislature further finds that the exceptions established by this section to the general prohibition against tied interests shall be limited to their express terms so as not to undermine the general prohibition and intends that this section be construed accordingly.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 309, Sec. 2.   (SB 386)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.62.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, an authorized licensee may sponsor events promoted by, and purchase advertising space and time from or on behalf of, a company that owns a facility that includes a wave basin located in the County of Kings in connection with activities conducted on the premises of a permanent retail licensee located at the wave basin facility, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The premises of the permanent retail licensee includes a wave basin facility with a capacity of at least 9,000 individuals located in the County of Kings. 

(2) The sponsorship or
 advertising space or time is purchased in connection with the sponsorship of activities that are held at the premises of a permanent retail licensee located at the wave basin facility.

(3) Any sponsorship or purchase of advertising space or time pursuant to this subdivision shall be accomplished by a written contract entered into by the authorized licensee and a company that owns a facility that includes a wave basin in the County of Kings.

(4) An agreement for advertising authorized by this subdivision shall not be contingent upon or otherwise require, directly or indirectly, implicitly or explicitly, the permanent retail licensee at the wave basin facility to purchase or sell any alcoholic beverages or other products produced, manufactured, imported, distributed, or
 otherwise represented by the event sponsor or purchaser of the advertising space and time.

(5) The permanent retail licensee at the wave basin facility shall offer for sale, in a bona fide manner, other brands of beer, distilled spirits, and wine distributed by a competing wholesaler or manufacturer in addition to any brand manufactured, distributed, or owned by the authorized licensee sponsoring an event or purchasing advertising space or time pursuant to this subdivision.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Authorized licensee” means a beer manufacturer, winegrower, rectifier, wine rectifier, distilled spirits manufacturer, craft distiller, distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent, winegrower’s agent,
 beer and wine importer, distilled spirits importer, distilled spirits importer general, beer and wine importer general, out-of-state distilled spirits shipper certificate holder, or out-of-state beer manufacturer certificate holder. “Authorized licensee” does not include any person who holds a distilled spirits importer license or distilled spirits importer general license together with a distilled spirits wholesaler’s license, or any person who holds a beer and wine importer license or beer and wine importer general license together with a beer and wine wholesaler’s license.

(2) “Wave basin” has the same meaning as defined in Section 115960.1 of the Health and
 Safety Code.

(c) The Legislature finds that it is necessary and proper to require a separation between manufacturing interests, wholesale interests, and retail interests in the production and distribution of alcoholic beverages in order to prevent suppliers from dominating local markets through vertical integration and to prevent excessive sales of alcoholic beverages produced by overly aggressive marketing techniques. The Legislature further finds that the exceptions established by this section to the general prohibition against tied interests must be limited to their express terms so as not to undermine the general prohibition, and intends that this section be construed accordingly.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 471, Sec. 1.   (AB 1294)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.63.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a beer manufacturer, holder of a winegrower’s license, winegrower’s agent, holder of any importer’s license that does not also hold a wholesaler or retail license as an additional license, distilled spirits manufacturer, holder of any rectifier’s license, or a distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent may sponsor events promoted by, and may purchase advertising space or time from, an operator of a for-profit cemetery subject to all of the following conditions:

(1) The for-profit cemetery shall be more than 100 years old, be located in, and designated a Historic-Cultural Monument by, the City of Los Angeles, have an endowment care fund and a memorial care fund that are exempt from the
 payment of income taxes, and hold a valid special on-sale general license for historic cemetery (Type 88).

(2) The sponsorship and the advertising space or time is purchased only in connection with the promotion of live artistic, concert, musical, film screening, food, beverage, culinary, lifestyle, or other cultural events permitted at the for-profit cemetery and permitted by the local jurisdiction.
